Texas, session 891, HB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  This Act may be cited as the Disaster Volunteer Management and Scam Prevention Act. SECTION 2.  Subtitle A, Title 16, Business & Commerce Code, is amended by adding Chapter 722 to read as follows: CHAPTER 722. SOCIAL MEDIA POSTS SOLICITING OR PROMOTING DISASTER-RELATED DONATIONS Sec. 722.001.  DEFINITIONS.  In this chapter: (1)  "Disaster" has the meaning assigned by Section 418.004, Government Code. (2)  "Social media platform" and "user" have the meanings assigned by Section 120.001. Sec. 722.002.  APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER.  This chapter applies only with respect to a user who resides in this state. Sec. 722.003.  WARNING REQUIRED ON CERTAIN POSTS SOLICITING OR PROMOTING DISASTER-RELATED DONATIONS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), an operator of a social media platform shall include a warning to users of its platform in connection with any post that solicits or promotes the donation of money in relation to a disaster. The warning must inform users of potential scams and encourage users to verify the source of the post. (b)  An operator of a social media platform is not required to include a warning described by Subsection (a) on a post originating from an account associated with a governmental entity. SECTION 3.  Chapter 402, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter E to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER E. VOLUNTARY STATE CERTIFICATION FOR DISASTER RELIEF ORGANIZATIONS Sec. 402.121.  DUTY TO ESTABLISH PROGRAM. (a)  The consumer protection division of the office of the attorney general, in consultation with the Texas Division of Emergency Management, shall establish a program by which a disaster relief organization may apply for and be certified as a state-recognized disaster relief organization. (b)  The attorney general shall adopt rules to implement this section. SECTION 4.  Subchapter F, Chapter 411, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 411.14104 to read as follows: Sec. 411.14104.  ACCESS TO CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION: TEXAS DIVISION OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT.  (a)  The Texas Division of Emergency Management is entitled to obtain criminal history record information as provided by Subsection (b) that relates to a person who applies to register as a volunteer under Subchapter M, Chapter 418. (b)  Subject to Sections 411.087 and 418.457 of this code and consistent with the public policy of this state, the Texas Division of Emergency Management is entitled to: (1)  obtain through the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history record information maintained or indexed by that bureau that relates to a person described by Subsection (a); and (2)  obtain from the department or any other criminal justice agency in this state criminal history record information maintained by the department or that criminal justice agency that relates to a person described by Subsection (a). (c)  The Texas Division of Emergency Management may not release or disclose to any person criminal history record information obtained from the Federal Bureau of Investigation under Subsection (b)(1).  Criminal history record information obtained by the Texas Division of Emergency Management under Subsection (b)(2) may not be released or disclosed to any person except on court order or as provided by Subsection (d). (d)  The Texas Division of Emergency Management is not prohibited from disclosing criminal history record information obtained under Subsection (b)(2) in a criminal proceeding. (e)  The Texas Division of Emergency Management shall destroy criminal history record information that is obtained under this section after the information is used for its authorized purpose. SECTION 5.  Chapter 418, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter M to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER M.  REGISTRATION OF CERTAIN DISASTER VOLUNTEERS REQUIRED Sec. 418.451.  DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter: (1)  "Disaster" has the meaning assigned by Section 418.004. (2)  "Disaster area" means a county any part of which is subject to: (A)  a disaster declaration issued by: (i)  the president of the United States under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Section 5121 et seq.); (ii)  the governor under Section 418.014; or (iii)  the presiding officer of the governing body of a political subdivision under Section 418.108; or (B)  an emergency evacuation order. (3)  "Disaster volunteer" means a person who provides or offers to provide a service at no cost to or at the direction of: (A)  a victim of a disaster; or (B)  a governmental entity engaged in disaster response or recovery. (4)  "Relative" has the meaning assigned by Section 20.01, Penal Code. (5)  "Volunteer firefighter" and "volunteer fire department" have the meanings assigned by Section 88.123, Education Code. Sec. 418.452.  NONAPPLICABILITY. This subchapter does not apply to a person who: (1)  resides in a disaster area; (2)  resides in a county adjacent to a disaster area; (3)  assists only a relative who is a victim of a disaster; or (4)  is an officer, employee, agent, contractor, subcontractor, or other person acting on behalf of a governmental entity, including a volunteer firefighter or other person acting on behalf of a volunteer fire department. Sec. 418.453.  DIVISION AS ADMINISTRATOR; RULES.  (a)  The division shall administer and enforce this subchapter. (b)  The division may adopt rules to implement this subchapter. Sec. 418.454.  REGISTRATION REQUIRED. A person may not serve in-person as a disaster volunteer in a disaster area unless the person registers with the division under this subchapter. Sec. 418.455.  ELIGIBILITY. (a)  A person may not register under this subchapter if the person is subject to: (1)  the sex offender registration requirements of Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; or (2)  an outstanding arrest warrant in any state or federal jurisdiction. (b)  The division shall establish other minimum eligibility criteria for a person to register under this subchapter as a disaster volunteer to ensure the safety of victims of a disaster and the effective and efficient use of government resources. Sec. 418.456.  APPLICATION. (a)  A person must apply in writing to register under this subchapter. (b)  The application must inquire whether the applicant is subject to: (1)  the sex offender registration requirements of Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; or (2)  an outstanding arrest warrant in any state or federal jurisdiction. (c)  As part of the application, the applicant must provide the division with a copy of: (1)  the applicant's current driver's license or identification card issued by any state; or (2)  as the division determines sufficient, other identification documents issued by this state, another state, or the federal government. Sec. 418.457.  AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECK. (a)  The division may conduct a criminal history check, including a check of any criminal history record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, in the manner provided by Subchapter F, Chapter 411, on each person who applies to register under this subchapter. (b)  For purposes of conducting the criminal history check, the division may require an applicant to submit a complete and legible set of fingerprints, on a form prescribed by the division, to the division or to the department for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the department and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (c)  The division may require the applicant to pay a fee to cover any costs associated with conducting a criminal history check under this section. Sec. 418.458.  LIMITATION ON REGISTRATION REQUIREMENT. A registration under this subchapter applies only to a disaster area and only for the period in which the applicable disaster declaration or emergency evacuation order is in effect. Sec. 418.459.  PENALTY FOR FAILURE TO REGISTER. (a)  A person commits an offense if the person violates Section 418.454. (b)  An offense under this section is: (1)  for a first offense, a Class C misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $25; or (2)  for a second or subsequent offense, a Class C misdemeanor. SECTION 6.  Section 31.03, Penal Code, is amended by amending Subsection (e) and adding Subsection (f-3) to read as follows: (e)  Except as otherwise provided by this section [Subsections (f) and (f-1)], an offense under this section is: (1)  a Class C misdemeanor if the value of the property stolen is less than $100; (2)  a Class B misdemeanor if: (A)  the value of the property stolen is $100 or more but less than $750; (B)  the value of the property stolen is less than $100 and the defendant has previously been convicted of any grade of theft; or (C)  the property stolen is a driver's license, commercial driver's license, or personal identification certificate issued by this state or another state; (3)  a Class A misdemeanor if the value of the property stolen is $750 or more but less than $2,500; (4)  a state jail felony if: (A)  the value of the property stolen is $2,500 or more but less than $30,000, or the property is less than 10 head of sheep, swine, or goats or any part thereof under the value of $30,000; (B)  regardless of value, the property is stolen from the person of another or from a human corpse or grave, including property that is a military grave marker; (C)  the property stolen is a firearm; (D)  the value of the property stolen is less than $2,500 and the defendant has been previously convicted two or more times of any grade of theft; (E)  the property stolen is an official ballot or official carrier envelope for an election; (F)  the value of the property stolen is less than $20,000 and the property stolen is: (i)  aluminum; (ii)  bronze; (iii)  copper; or (iv)  brass; [or] (G)  the cost of replacing the property stolen is less than $30,000 and the property stolen is a catalytic converter; or (H)  the value of the property stolen is less than $30,000 and the property was stolen in a disaster area and came into the actor's custody, possession, or control by virtue of the actor's status or purported status as a disaster volunteer, as that term is defined by Section 418.451, Government Code; (5)  a felony of the third degree if the value of the property stolen is $30,000 or more but less than $150,000, or the property is: (A)  cattle, horses, or exotic livestock or exotic fowl as defined by Section 142.001, Agriculture Code, stolen during a single transaction and having an aggregate value of less than $150,000; (B)  10 or more head of sheep, swine, or goats stolen during a single transaction and having an aggregate value of less than $150,000; or (C)  a controlled substance, having a value of less than $150,000, if stolen from: (i)  a commercial building in which a controlled substance is generally stored, including a pharmacy, clinic, hospital, nursing facility, or warehouse; or (ii)  a vehicle owned or operated by a wholesale distributor of prescription drugs; (6)  a felony of the second degree if: (A)  the value of the property stolen is $150,000 or more but less than $300,000; or (B)  the value of the property stolen is less than $300,000 and the property stolen is an automated teller machine or the contents or components of an automated teller machine; or (7)  a felony of the first degree if the value of the property stolen is $300,000 or more. (f-3)  The increase in the punishment provided by Section 12.50 for an offense under this section does not apply if the penalty described by Subsection (e)(4)(H) applies. SECTION 7.  Section 31.03(h), Penal Code, is amended by adding Subdivision (9) to read as follows: (9)  "Disaster area" is an area that was, at the time of the offense: (A)  subject to a disaster declaration issued by: (i)  the president of the United States under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Section 5121 et seq.); (ii)  the governor under Section 418.014, Government Code; or (iii)  the presiding officer of the governing body of a political subdivision under Section 418.108, Government Code; or (B)  subject to an emergency evacuation order. SECTION 8.  Subchapter D, Chapter 32, Penal Code, is amended by adding Section 32.61 to read as follows: Sec. 32.61.  MALICIOUS SOLICITATION OF DISASTER VICTIM OR FOR DISASTER RESPONSE OR RECOVERY. (a)  In this section: (1)  "Disaster" has the meaning assigned by Section 418.004, Government Code. (2)  "Disaster volunteer" has the meaning assigned by Section 418.451, Government Code. (3)  "Victim of a disaster" means a person who has suffered harm as a result of a disaster. (b)  A person commits an offense if the person, with the intent to defraud or harm any person: (1)  solicits a donation from another person while inducing the other person to believe that the donation will be used for disaster response or recovery, regardless of the manner of solicitation; (2)  solicits payment from a victim of a disaster after: (A)  providing services to the victim that are related to disaster response or recovery, including debris removal or transportation; and (B)  inducing the victim to believe that: (i)  the person is a disaster volunteer; and (ii)  the services described by Paragraph (A) would be provided at no cost to the victim; or (3)  solicits payment from a victim of a disaster while inducing the victim to believe that the actor will search for or return to the victim a relative who is believed to be missing as a result of the disaster. (c)  An offense under Subsection (b)(1) or (2) is: (1)  for a first offense, a felony of the third degree; or (2)  for a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the second degree. (d)  An offense under Subsection (b)(3) is a felony of the first degree. (e)  If conduct that constitutes an offense under this section also constitutes an offense under any other law, the actor may be prosecuted under this section or the other law, or both. SECTION 9.  Subchapter M, Chapter 418, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a disaster declaration or emergency evacuation order issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 10.  Section 31.03, Penal Code, as amended by this Act, applies only to an offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act.  An offense committed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the offense was committed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose.  For purposes of this section, an offense was committed before the effective date of this Act if any element of the offense occurred before that date. SECTION 11.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.